dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX W Y 59
PFX W 0 aba . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ababa . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 abubu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 akuku . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 alili . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 alulu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ama . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 angeba . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 angema . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 angim . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 aniba . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 asiba . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 asisi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 awama . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 awum . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 awumu . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ayimi . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ayin . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 azizin . NEG_COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ba . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 bu . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 eli . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 elingeli . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 emi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 en . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 engemi . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 engen . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 engim . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 engingem . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esiba . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esingeba . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esingesi . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ezin . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ezingezin . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 in . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ka . ADJECTIVE
PFX W 0 ku . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 li . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 lu . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ma . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 mi . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 mu . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 ngim . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 niba . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 niba . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ningeba . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 obu . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 obungebu . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 oku . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 okungeku . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 olu . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 olungelu . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 om . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ongem . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 si . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 siba . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 um . COPULATIVE
PFX W 0 zin . COPULATIVE
