dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
bili/WY
bi/WY
dala/WY
de/WY
fishane/WY
fushane/WY
hlanu/WY
hle/WY
khulu/WY
ncane/WY
ne/WY
ngakhi/WY
ningi/WY
nye/WY
sha/WY
thathu/WY
